Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5464.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 15. (1) Upon receipt of a request by certified mail to the commission by the holder of an industrial facilities exemption certificate requesting revocation of the certificate, the commission shall by order revoke the certificate in whole or revoke the certificate with respect to its real property component, or its personal property component, whichever is requested. (2) The legislative body of a local governmental unit may by resolution request the commission to revoke the industrial facilities exemption certificate of a facility upon the grounds that, except as provided in section 7a, completion of the replacement facility or new facility has not occurred within 2 years after the effective date of the certificate, unless a greater time has been authorized by the commission for good cause; that the replacement, restoration, or construction of the facility has not occurred within 6 years after the date the initial industrial facilities exemption certificate was issued as provided in section 7a, unless a greater time has been authorized by the commission for good cause; that completion of the speculative building has not occurred within 2 years after the date the certificate was issued except as provided in section 7a, unless a greater time has been authorized by the commission for good cause; that a speculative building for which a certificate has been issued but is not yet effective has been used as other than a manufacturing, warehousing, or distribution facility; that the certificate issued for a speculative building has not become effective within 2 years after the December 31 following the date the certificate was issued; or that the purposes for which the certificate was issued are not being fulfilled as a result of a failure of the holder to proceed in good faith with the replacement, restoration, or construction and operation of the replacement facility or new facility or with the use of the speculative building as a manufacturing, warehousing, or distribution facility in a manner consistent with the purposes of this act and in the absence of circumstances that are beyond the control of the holder. (3) Upon receipt of the resolution, the commission shall give notice in writing by certified mail to the holder of the certificate, to the local legislative body, to the assessor of the assessing unit, and to the legislative body of each local taxing unit which that levies taxes upon property in the local governmental unit in which the facility is located. The commission shall afford to the holder of the certificate, the local legislative body, the assessor, and a representative of the legislative body of each taxing unit an opportunity for a hearing. The commission shall by order revoke the certificate if the commission finds that completion except as provided in section 7a of the replacement facility or new facility has not occurred within 2 years after the effective date of the certificate or a greater time as authorized by the commission for good cause; that completion of the speculative building has not occurred within 2 years after the date the certificate was issued except as provided in section 7a, unless a greater time has been authorized by the commission for good cause; that a speculative building for which a certificate has been issued but is not yet effective has been used as other than a manufacturing, warehousing, or distribution facility; that the certificate issued for a speculative building has not become effective within 2 years after the December 31 following the date the certificate was issued; or that the holder of the certificate has not proceeded in good faith with the replacement, restoration, or construction and operation of the facility or with the use of the speculative building as a manufacturing, warehousing, or distribution facility in good faith in a manner consistent with the purposes of this act and in the absence of circumstances that are beyond the control of the holder. (4) The order of the commission revoking the certificate shall must be effective on the December 31 next following the date of the order and the commission shall send by certified mail copies of its order of revocation to the holder of the certificate, to the local legislative body, to the assessor of the assessing unit in which the facility is located, and to the legislative body of each taxing unit which that levies taxes upon property in the local governmental unit in which the facility is located. (5) A revocation of a certificate issued for a speculative building shall must specify and apply only to that portion of the speculative building for which the grounds for revocation relate. (6) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, upon the written request of the holder of a revoked industrial facilities exemption certificate to the local unit of government and the commission or upon the application of a subsequent owner to the local governing body to transfer the revoked industrial facilities exemption certificate to a subsequent owner, and the submission to the commission of a resolution of concurrence by the legislative body of the local unit of government in which the facility is located, and if the facility continues to qualify under this act, the commission may reinstate a revoked industrial facilities exemption certificate for the holder or a subsequent owner that has applied for the transfer. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5463 (request no. H02894'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.